New York, session 2025-2026, A10371.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (v) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 2 section 6908 of the education law, as added by section 1 of part A of 3 chapter 58 of the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 4 (v) tasks provided by a direct support staff in programs certified or 5 approved by the office for people with developmental disabilities, 6 including self-direction, when [performed under] the [supervision of a 7 registered professional nurse and pursuant to a memorandum of under- 8 standing between the office for people with] direct support staff has 9 completed training provided by the individual with an intellectual or 10 developmental [disabilities and the department, in accordance with and 11 pursuant to an] disability, or, when applicable, by the individual's 12 parent, legal guardian, or other legally authorized [practitioner's 13 ordered care, provided that: (1) a registered professional nurse deter- 14 mines] representative, in [his or her professional judgment, which tasks 15 are to be performed based upon the complexity of the tasks,] accordance 16 with consumer-directed principles. The commissioner shall establish 17 appropriate protocols to ensure the [skill and experience of the] safe 18 administration of medications and to ensure that a direct support 19 staff[, and] shall not assess the [health status of the] medication 20 needs of an individual [being cared for; (2) only a]. A direct support 21 staff [who] has completed training as required by the commissioner of 22 the office for people with developmental disabilities [may perform 23 tasks] pursuant to this subparagraph[; (3)] provided that the commis- 24 sioner establish appropriate protocols shall be established to ensure 25 safe administration of medications[; (4)] and to ensure that a direct 26 support staff shall not assess the medication needs of an individual[; 27 (5) adequate nursing supervision is provided, including training and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14628-01-6 A. 10371 2 1 periodic inspection of performance of the tasks. The amount and type of 2 nursing supervision shall be determined by the registered professional 3 nurse responsible for supervising such task based upon the complexity of 4 the tasks, the skill and experience of the direct support staff, and the 5 health status of the individual being cared for; (6) a]. A direct 6 support staff shall not be authorized to perform any tasks or activities 7 pursuant to this subparagraph that are outside the scope of practice of 8 a licensed practical nurse[; (7) a]. A direct support staff shall not 9 represent [himself or herself] themselves, or accept employment, as a 10 person licensed to practice nursing under the provisions of this arti- 11 cle[; (8)]. A direct support staff providing medication administration, 12 tube feeding, or diabetic care shall be separately certified, and shall 13 be recertified on an annual basis[; (9) the registered professional 14 nurse shall ensure that there is a consumer specific]. If an individual 15 with an intellectual or developmental disability is unable to self-ad- 16 minister medication [sheet for each medication that is administered; and 17 (10) appropriate staffing ratios shall be determined by the office for 18 people with developmental disabilities and the department to ensure 19 adequate nursing supervision. No direct support staff shall perform 20 tasks under this subparagraph until the office for people with develop- 21 mental disabilities and the department have entered into a memorandum of 22 understanding to effectuate the provisions of this subparagraph. The 23 office for people with developmental disabilities shall complete a crim- 24 inal background check pursuant to section 16.33 of the mental hygiene 25 law and an agency background check pursuant to section 16.34 of the 26 mental hygiene law on the direct support staff prior to the commencement 27 of any provision of service provided under this subparagraph if such 28 direct support staff is a new hire. Individuals providing supervision 29 or] , a parent, legal guardian, or other legally authorized represen- 30 tative may authorize a trained direct support [tasks pursuant to this 31 subparagraph shall have protection pursuant] professional to [sections 32 seven hundred forty and seven hundred forty-one of] administer medica- 33 tions on the [labor law, where applicable] individual's behalf; 34 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 35 it shall have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed July 36 1, 2030. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 37 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 38 its effective date are authorized to be made on or before such date.